Washington statutes.
RCW 35.85.060

Procedure.

Any such improvement may be initiated and assessments therefor determined and levied as prescribed in RCW 35.85.020 to 35.85.040, inclusive.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.85.060. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 168 s 2; RRS s 9005-2.]